Washington statutes.
RCW 19.02.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Business license" means the single document designed for public display issued by the business licensing service, which certifies state agency or local government license approval and which incorporates the endorsements for individual licenses included in the business licensing system, which the state or local government requires for any person subject to this chapter.

(2) "Business license application" means a document incorporating pertinent data from existing applications for licenses covered under this chapter.

(3) "Business licensing service" means the business registration and licensing service established by this chapter and located in and under the administrative control of the department of revenue.

(4) "Department" means the department of revenue.

(5) "Director" means the director of the department.

(6) "License" means the whole or part of any agency or local government permit, license, certificate, approval, registration, charter, or any form or permission required by law, including agency rule, to engage in any activity.

(7) "License information packet" means a collection of information about licensing requirements and application procedures custom-assembled for each request.

(8) "Participating local government" means a municipal corporation or political subdivision that participates in the business licensing system established by this chapter.

(9) "Person" means any individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, association, cooperative, corporation, nonprofit organization, state or local government agency, and any other organization required to register with the state or a participating local government to do business in the state or the participating local government and to obtain one or more licenses from the state or any of its agencies or the participating local government.

(10) "Regulatory" means all licensing and other governmental or statutory requirements pertaining to business or professional activities.

(11) "Regulatory agency" means any state agency, board, commission, division, or local government that regulates one or more professions, occupations, industries, businesses, or activities.

(12) "Renewal application" means a document used to collect pertinent data for renewal of licenses covered under this chapter.

(13) "System" or "business licensing system" means the procedure by which business licenses are issued and renewed, license and regulatory information is collected and disseminated with due regard to privacy statutes, and account data is exchanged by the agencies and participating local governments.

[ 2013 c 144 s 16. Prior: 2011 c 298 s 4; 1993 c 142 s 3; 1992 c 107 s 1; 1982 c 182 s 2; 1979 c 158 s 75; 1977 ex.s. c 319 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Intent—2011 c 298: "The purpose of this act is to improve customer service by transferring the master license service program from the department of licensing to the department of revenue. It is the legislature's intent that all licenses obtained or renewed through the master license service as of March 1, 2011, will continue to be obtained or renewed through the master license service after the master license service program is transferred to the department of revenue effective July 1, 2011." [ 2011 c 298 s 1.]

Agency transfer—2011 c 298: "(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of licensing pertaining to the administration of chapters 19.02, 19.80, and 59.30 RCW are transferred to the department of revenue. All references to the department of licensing or the director of licensing in the Revised Code of Washington must be construed to mean the department of revenue or the director of revenue when referring to the powers, duties, and functions transferred under this section.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material, including electronic records and files, in the possession of the department of licensing pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred to the department of revenue under this section must be delivered to the custody of the department of revenue. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of licensing in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred must be made available to the department of revenue. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred must be assigned to the department of revenue.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of licensing for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred must, on July 1, 2011, be transferred and credited to the department of revenue.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management must make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the department of licensing primarily engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of revenue. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of revenue to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of licensing pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred must be continued and acted upon by the department of revenue. All existing contracts and obligations must remain in full force and must be performed by the department of revenue.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of licensing does not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 2011.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management must certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these must make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(7) All classified employees of the department of licensing assigned to the department of revenue under this section whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the department of revenue must become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the department of revenue and must be considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing bargaining unit, if any, under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW." [ 2011 c 298 s 2.]

Contracting—2011 c 298: "To ensure a seamless transfer of the master license service program from the department of licensing to the department of revenue and to prevent any disruption of service to persons seeking to use the master license system, the department of revenue is authorized to contract, under chapter 39.34 RCW, with the department of licensing for support in administering chapters 19.02, 19.80, and 59.30 RCW. Any contract entered into pursuant to this section must be for a duration no longer than necessary to fully and effectively transfer the master license service program from the department of licensing to the department of revenue." [ 2011 c 298 s 3.]

Effective date—2011 c 298: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2011." [ 2011 c 298 s 43.]

Effective dates—1992 c 107: "(1) Sections 1 through 4, 6, and 8 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect June 1, 1992.

(2) Sections 5 and 7 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1992." [ 1992 c 107 s 9.]